Virginia statutes. Title 30. General Assembly.
Chapter 1. General Assembly and Officers Thereof.
§ 30-19.05.
Repealed by Acts 2003, cc. 757 and 758, cl. 2, effective July 1, 2004.

Editor’s note.

Former § 30-19.05, regarding legislative consideration of certain exemptions from the retail sales and use tax, was enacted by Acts 1989, c. 739; 1993, c. 310; 1994, c. 222; 1996, cc. 499, 606; 1999, cc. 762, 776; 2000, c. 172.

§§ 30-19.1,
30-19.1 1.

Repealed by Acts 2010, c. 410, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §§ 30-19.1 and 30-19.1:1, relating to Limiting time for introduction of certain bills; preparation and distribution of summary, and Limiting time for introduction of claims bills, respectively, were derived from Acts 1952, c. 620; 1969, Ex. Sess., c. 24; 1972, c. 155; 1974, c. 635; 1985, c. 387; 2000, c. 260; and Acts 1986, c. 514; 2000, c. 260, respectively.

§ 30-19.1:2.
Repealed by Acts 2003, c. 1032, cl. 2, effective January 1, 2003.

Editor’s note.

Former § 30-19.1:2, which limited time for introduction of property tax exemption bills, was derived from Acts 1989, c. 587; 1995, c. 346.

§ 30-19.1:3.
Repealed by Acts 2010, c. 410, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former § 30-19.1:3, relating to Limiting time for introduction and consideration of retail sales and use tax exemption bills, was enacted by Acts 1989, c. 739, and amended by Acts 1994, c. 222; 1996, c. 606; 1998, c. 812; 1999, cc. 762, 776; 2000, c. 172; 2003, cc. 757, 758.

§ 30-19.1:4.
Increase in terms of imprisonment or commitment; fiscal impact statements; appropriations for operating costs.

The Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission shall prepare a fiscal impact statement reflecting the operating costs attributable to and necessary appropriations for any bill which would result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities. The Department of Planning and Budget shall annually provide the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission with the operating cost per inmate.

The Department of Planning and Budget, in conjunction with the Department of Juvenile Justice, shall prepare a fiscal impact statement reflecting the operating costs attributable to and necessary appropriations for any bill that would result in a net increase in periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.

The requirement for a fiscal impact statement includes, but is not limited to, those bills which add new crimes for which imprisonment or commitment is authorized, increase the periods of imprisonment or commitment authorized for existing crimes, impose minimum or mandatory minimum terms of imprisonment or commitment, or modify the law governing release of prisoners or juveniles in such a way that the time served in prison, or the time committed to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice, will increase.

The fiscal impact statement of any bill introduced on or after July 1, 2002, that would result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment in state correctional facilities or periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice, shall include an analysis of the fiscal impact on local and regional jails, state and local pretrial and community-based probation services agencies and juvenile detention facilities.

The amount of the estimated appropriation reflected in the fiscal impact statement shall be printed on the face of each such bill, but shall not be codified. If the agency responsible for preparing the fiscal impact statement does not have sufficient information to project the impact, the fiscal impact statement shall state this, and the words “Cannot be determined” shall be printed on the face of each such bill.

The fiscal impact statement shall include, but not be limited to, details as to any increase or decrease in the offender population. Statements prepared by the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission shall detail any necessary adjustments in guideline midpoints for the crime or crimes affected by the bill as well as adjustments in guideline midpoints for other crimes affected by the implementation of the bill that, in the opinion of the Commission, are necessary and appropriate.

The agency preparing the fiscal impact statement shall forward copies of such impact statements to the Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Clerk of the Senate for transmittal to each patron of the legislation and to the chairman of each committee of the General Assembly to consider the legislation.

For each law enacted which results in a net increase in periods of imprisonment in state correctional facilities or a net increase in periods of commitment or the time committed to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice, a one-year appropriation shall be made from the general fund equal to the estimated increase in operating costs of such law, in current dollars, of the highest of the next six fiscal years following the effective date of the law. “Operating costs” means all costs other than capital outlay costs.

The Corrections Special Reserve Fund (the Fund) is hereby established as a nonreverting special fund on the books of the Comptroller. The Fund shall consist of all moneys appropriated by the General Assembly under the provisions of this section and all interest thereon. Any moneys deposited in the Fund shall remain in the Fund at the end of the biennium. Moneys in the Fund shall be expended solely for capital expenses, including the cost of planning or preplanning studies that may be required to initiate capital outlay projects.

History.

1993, c. 804; 1996, c. 972; 2000, cc. 825, 833; 2004, c. 461; 2007, c. 133.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 49 A, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “For any fiscal impact statement prepared by the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission pursuant to § 30-19.1:4, Code of Virginia, for which the commission does not have sufficient information to project the impact, the commission shall assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000 to the bill and this amount shall be printed on the face of each such bill, but shall not be codified. The provisions of § 30-19.1:4, paragraph H. shall be applicable to any such bill.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 825 and 833 are virtually identical, and rewrote the section.
Acts 2000, c. 833, also inserted “and the Clerk of the Senate” in subsection G.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 461 inserted “minimum” following “mandatory” in subsection C.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 133 substituted “local pretrial and community-based probation services agencies” for “local community corrections programs” in subsection D.

§ 30-19.1:5.
Repealed by Acts 2000, cc. 825 and 833.

Cross references.

For current policy on preparation of impact statements, see § 30-19.1:4.

Editor’s note.

Former § 30-19.1:5, regarding impact statements to be prepared by the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission, was derived from Acts 1995, c. 462; 1999, c. 286.

§ 30-19.1:6.
Repealed by Acts 2010, c. 410, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former § 30-19.1:6, relating to limiting time for introduction of bills which increase terms of imprisonment, was enacted by Acts 1995, c. 462; and amended by Acts 1996, c. 685.

§ 30-19.1:7.
Bills related to the Virginia Retirement System; impact statements.

In accordance with a joint resolution that establishes a schedule for the conduct of business coming before a regular session of the General Assembly, the Board of Trustees of the Virginia Retirement System shall investigate, prepare, and submit to the Clerk of the House of Delegates, the Clerk of the Senate, the Commission on Local Government, the House Committee on Appropriations, and the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations, a statement of (i) the financial impact of the proposed bill upon the general fund and the various local governments that have elected to become part of the Virginia Retirement System pursuant to §

51.1-800

and (ii) the policy implications that such bill will have on the various systems administered by the Board of Trustees. Such statement shall also note the potential impact any introduced bill will have on local government independent retirement systems.

History.

1997, c. 610; 2001, c. 680; 2010, c. 410.

Cross references.

As to the Commission on Local Government, generally, see §

15.2-2900

et seq.

Editor’s note.

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations” for “Senate Committee on Finance.” March 10, 2021.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 680, in the first paragraph, substituted “any retirement system established in Title 51.1” for “the Virginia Retirement System (§

51.1-124.1

et seq.), State Police Officers’ Retirement System (§

51.1-200

et seq.), or Judicial Retirement System (§

51.1-300

et seq.)” near the beginning and substituted “filed in accordance with the rules of the General Assembly” for “with the consent of two-thirds of the members elected to the house in which the bill is offered” at the end.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 410 deleted the first paragraph, which formerly read: “Any bill proposing to amend, add, repeal, or modify any provision of any retirement system established in Title 51.1 shall be introduced for consideration by the General Assembly no later than the first calendar day of any regular session of the General Assembly unless (i) requested in writing by the Governor or (ii) filed in accordance with the rules of the General Assembly.” and made a minor stylistic change in the remaining paragraph.

§ 30-19.1:8.
Repealed by Acts 1999, c. 572.

Editor’s note.

Former § 30-19.1:8, relating to impact statements, was enacted by Acts 1998, c. 765.

§ 30-19.1:9.
Duration of state boards and commissions.

After January 1, 2003, all bills creating an advisory board, council, commission or other collegial body in the executive branch of state government shall contain a provision requiring the expiration of such body three years after its creation.

History.

2003, c. 793.

§ 30-19.1:10.
Repealed by Acts 2005, cc. 860, 889, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former § 30-19.1:10, which specified certain requirements for legislation creating voluntary contributions of refunds to organizations, was enacted by Acts 2004, c. 649.

§ 30-19.1:11.
Legislation that creates or renews tax credits.

No bill proposing to add a new state tax credit or renew an existing state tax credit shall be reported from any committee of the General Assembly unless such bill contains an expiration date of not longer than five years from the effective date of the new or renewed state tax credit.

History.

2012, c. 265.

Law Review.

For annual survey of Virginia law article, “Taxation,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 307 (2012).

§ 30-19.1:12.
Executive orders; impact statements by the Joint Legislative Audit and Review Commission.

At the request of the chairman of any committee of the Senate or House of Delegates, the Joint Legislative Audit and Review Commission shall review any executive order issued by the Governor and prepare a statement reflecting the potential fiscal impact of such executive order on the operations of state government.

The Joint Legislative Audit and Review Commission shall forward copies of the impact statement prepared pursuant to subsection A to the requesting chairman of the standing committee of both houses of the General Assembly to which matters relating to the content of the executive order are most properly referable.

History.

2016, c. 623.

§ 30-19.1:13.
Racial and ethnic impact statements for criminal justice legislation.

As used in this section:“Disparities” means the difference in criminal justice outcomes for a racial or ethnic subgroup compared to their share of the state population.“Racial and ethnic impact statement” means a statement created using available data to outline the potential impact of a criminal justice bill on racial and ethnic disparities within the Commonwealth.

At the request of the Chair of the House Committee for Courts of Justice or the Chair of the Senate Committee on the Judiciary, the Joint Legislative Audit and Review Commission shall review and prepare a racial and ethnic impact statement for a proposed criminal justice bill.

The Joint Legislative Audit and Review Commission shall forward copies of the racial and ethnic impact statement prepared pursuant to subsection B to the patron of the bill and the Chair of the House Committee for Courts of Justice or the Chair of the Senate Committee on the Judiciary, as appropriate.

No more than three racial and ethnic impact statements may be requested by the Chair of the House Committee for Courts of Justice and no more than three racial and ethnic impact statements may be requested by the Chair of the Senate Committee on the Judiciary for completion during a single regular session of the General Assembly.

Upon the request of the Joint Legislative Audit and Review Commission, the Office of the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court, Virginia State Police, Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission, Department of Corrections, and all other state agencies shall expeditiously provide necessary data and assistance for the preparation of racial and ethnic impact statements.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 183.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021, pursuant to Va. Const. Art. IV, § 13.

§ 30-19.2.
Inspection of certain state facilities by, or orientation for, members and future members of the General Assembly.

Inspections may be made of the grounds, buildings, and other physical facilities appurtenant to state agencies and state-supported institutions, at the times and by the persons hereinafter set forth.

The Governor may arrange for such inspection in each year preceding the regular session of the General Assembly for the members of the forthcoming General Assembly. Such inspection trips shall be provided at state expense for each member of the General Assembly.

Transportation, meals, lodging, and other necessary accommodations for the persons making the inspection for which this section provides shall be provided from funds appropriated to the General Assembly. Travel shall be arranged by motor bus or other convenient method of transportation from some central point from which trips to the several state agencies and institutions shall be made. The Governor shall notify the persons permitted to make such inspection of the place and time of origin from which such trip shall begin and when it is expected to end; and shall make such arrangements as will be convenient to the persons desiring to make such trip of inspection.

The persons making such trip shall be allowed their reasonable expenses in going to and from their homes to the point of origin of the trips. Compensation shall be paid as provided in §§ 30-19.12 and 30-19.15.

Nothing contained in this section is intended to restrict in any way the right of any member of the General Assembly to visit at his expense any state institution at any time.

Orientation sessions on the organization, programs, operations, and procedures of the Executive Department of state government may be provided in lieu of inspections of state facilities. The Governor may arrange for such orientation in each year preceding the regular session of the General Assembly for members and members-elect of the forthcoming General Assembly.

History.

1952, c. 102; 1960, c. 575; 1979, c. 466.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the 1952 act having assigned no number.

§ 30-19.3.
Prefiling of bills and resolutions.

Any member or member-elect of the next regular session of the General Assembly may prefile bills and resolutions for even-numbered-year regular sessions beginning the third Monday in November of the preceding year with the Clerk of the House of Delegates or Senate as appropriate.
A. 1. Any member or member-elect of the next regular session of the General Assembly may prefile bills and resolutions for even-numbered-year regular sessions beginning the third Monday in November of the preceding year with the Clerk of the House of Delegates or Senate as appropriate.

Any member or member-elect of the General Assembly may prefile bills and resolutions for odd-numbered-year regular sessions beginning the third Monday in July of the preceding year with the Clerk of the House of Delegates or Senate as appropriate.

Any bill or resolution prefiled shall be endorsed by the handwritten signature of at least one member or member-elect as a patron. An electronic signature may be substituted for a handwritten signature on prefiled legislation as may be approved by each house in accordance with its rules and procedures. In no event shall a bill or resolution be prefiled by a member of the General Assembly who was not re-elected to the next regular session of the General Assembly. The deadline for submitting drafting requests for legislation to be prefiled to the Division of Legislative Services and the deadline for prefiling legislation with the appropriate Clerk shall be established by the procedural resolution adopted by the General Assembly, or in default thereof, adopted by the Joint Rules Committee.

In the event of the convening of a special session of the General Assembly, only bills relating to the stated purpose of such special session and resolutions affecting the rules of procedure or schedule of business of the General Assembly may be prefiled as provided in subsection A of this section beginning on the day on which either (i) the Governor announces the date on which such special session is to convene, or (ii) two-thirds of the members elected to each house of the General Assembly make application to the Governor for the convening of such special session.

The Clerks of the House of Delegates and Senate shall assign numbers to prefiled bills and resolutions in the order of their receipt, refer them to the appropriate committee with the advice of the Speaker of the House of Delegates, in the case of House bills, and in the case of Senate bills, in accordance with the Rules of the Senate, and have a sufficient number of them printed for circulation as provided in this section.

Printed prefiled bills and resolutions shall be periodically mailed to each member and member-elect of the General Assembly and shall be made available to the press and public in the same manner as bills and resolutions introduced after the General Assembly convenes.

History.

1969, Ex. Sess., c. 24; 1973, c. 488; 1981, c. 196; 1987, c. 124; 2001, cc. 568, 584; 2004, c. 718; 2007, c. 442; 2012, c. 670.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, c. 670, cl. 2, made the 2012 amendment to subdivision A 3 expire on July 1, 2014. However, Acts 2014, c. 517, cl. 1, repealed Acts 2012, c. 670, cl. 2, and therefore the 2012 amendment to subdivision A 3 will not expire.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 568 and 584 are identical, and substituted the present subsection designators A through D for the former subsection designators (a), (a1), (b), and (c); added the last sentence in subsection A; and substituted “in subsection A of this” for “in subsection (a) of this” in subsection B.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 718 rewrote subsection A; and substituted “prefiled” for “filed” in subsection B.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 442 rewrote subsection A, which formerly read: “Any member or member-elect of the General Assembly may prefile bills and resolutions for even-numbered-year regular sessions beginning the third Monday in November of the preceding year and for odd-numbered-year regular sessions beginning the third Monday in July of the preceding year with the Clerk of the House of Delegates or Senate as appropriate. Any bill or resolution prefiled shall be endorsed by the handwritten signature of at least one member or member-elect as a patron. The deadline for submitting drafting requests for legislation to be prefiled to the Division of Legislative Services and the deadline for prefiling legislation with the appropriate Clerk shall be established by the procedural resolution adopted by the General Assembly, or in default thereof, adopted by the Joint Rules Committee.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 670 inserted the present second sentence of subdivision A 3. See Editor’s note.

§ 30-19.4.
Secretaries and administrative assistants for officers and members of General Assembly; staff personnel for standing committees.

The General Assembly shall provide for the employment of secretaries and administrative assistants for the Speaker of the House of Delegates, the President pro tempore of the Senate, the Majority and Minority Floor Leaders of the House of Delegates and Senate and members of the General Assembly to aid in the performance of duties incidental to the legislative process. Allowances for such secretaries and assistants shall be provided as set forth in the general appropriations act. Such allowances shall not be utilized for political purposes and shall be further conditioned upon such limitations and restrictions as shall be set forth in the general appropriations act. The session day per diem for each administrative assistant shall equal the amount authorized for members of the General Assembly as set forth in the general appropriations act.

The General Assembly shall provide for the employment of such clerks, counsel and other staff personnel for each of the standing committees as are approved by the Rules Committee of the appropriate house.

No member of the immediate family of a member of the General Assembly shall be eligible to receive any sum authorized under the provisions of this section. For the purpose of this section the spouse, parent, child, brother or sister of the member shall be considered a member of the immediate family.

History.

1972, c. 822; 1973, c. 512; 1974, c. 356; 1976, c. 735; 1979, c. 475; 1980, c. 151; 1984, c. 161; 2005, c. 802.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 802 added the last sentence in the first paragraph.

§ 30-19.5.
Supervisory control of Division of Legislative Services.

Supervisory control of the Division of Legislative Services shall be vested jointly in the Committees on Rules of the House of Delegates and the Senate, meeting jointly.

History.

1973, c. 322.

§ 30-19.6.
Repealed by Acts 1986, c. 156.

§ 30-19.7.
Repealed by Acts 1990, c. 485.

§ 30-19.8.
Collection of information by legislative study groups; policy.

It shall be the policy of the Commonwealth that each legislative study group, including the Virginia Advisory Legislative Council and its subcommittees, the Virginia Code Commission, special legislative study commissions, and standing committees of the House and Senate and their subcommittees, either through its members or staff, advise the agency head of the general nature of a study or investigation being conducted by such group whenever it determines that information within such agency is applicable to such study or investigation. Thereafter, such legislative study group may seek out all information within such agency from an individual designated by the agency head to provide pertinent information or from the most direct and primary source without further communication or contact with the agency head. Each employee within such agency shall give his full cooperation to the group and its staff in collecting the information. No member or staff member of such groups shall be entitled to access to information, without permission of the agency head, for which disclosure is prohibited by specific provisions of law.

Insofar as possible, the legislative study groups and their staffs shall perform their collection duties, and utilize the services of personnel within the agencies in doing so, in such a manner as to minimize disruption of the normal operations of the agency.

Such freedom to access of all information within all state agencies is deemed absolutely necessary for the legislature to be able to efficiently evaluate laws and policies of the Commonwealth, how they are being administered, and the need for changes in such laws and policies, and also for the Virginia General Assembly to effectively fulfill its responsibility regarding legislative oversight.

History.

1977, c. 433.

§ 30-19.8:1.
Due dates for legislative reports.

Legislative commissions, councils, and other legislative bodies required to report annually to the General Assembly and Governor shall submit their annual reports on or before June 30 of each year, unless otherwise specified. Annual reports submitted pursuant to this section shall cover the preceding legislative interim period and may include actions taken by the General Assembly during the regular session of the current calendar year.

Joint subcommittees, joint committees, and other legislative entities required or requested by law or resolution to conduct a study shall submit their reports no later than June 30 of the reporting year, unless otherwise specified. The reports may include actions taken by the General Assembly during the regular session of the current calendar year.

History.

2005, c. 633.

§ 30-19.8:2.
Absences on legislative commissions.

The absence of any appointed nonlegislative citizen member from three consecutive regular meetings of any joint subcommittee, board, commission, authority, council, or other body that has been created or established in the legislative branch unless on account of sickness shall be sufficient cause for the original appointing authority to declare the position vacated and to fill such vacancy.

History.

2014, c. 634.

§ 30-19.9.
Distribution of information on proposed constitutional amendments to voters.

When a proposed amendment is to be submitted to the people for their approval and ratification pursuant to Article XII, Section 1 of the Constitution of Virginia and § 30-19, the State Board of Elections shall cause to be printed and distributed to the general registrar of each county and city, not less than ninety days prior to the election, copies of an explanation of such amendment to be placed at each registration site in sufficient number to provide a copy to any interested person, and to election officials to be posted at the polling places on the day of the election. The State Board shall post the explanation on its site on the Internet. It also shall cause such explanation to be published by paid advertisement in each daily newspaper with an average daily circulation of more than 50,000 in Virginia, and published in Virginia or in a contiguous state or district, once during the week preceding the final day for registration and once during the week preceding the election at which the proposed amendment is to be presented to the people.

The explanation shall contain the ballot question, the full text of the proposed constitutional amendment, and a statement of not more than 500 words on the proposed amendment. The explanation shall be presented in plain English, shall be limited to a neutral explanation, which may include a brief statement on the effect of a “yes” and “no” vote on the question but shall not include arguments submitted by either proponents or opponents of the proposal. The Division of Legislative Services, in consultation with such agencies of state government as may be appropriate, including the Office of Attorney General, shall prepare an explanation for any such proposal which is approved by the General Assembly on first reference and referred to the next regular session of the General Assembly following the general election of members of the House of Delegates. The explanation shall be approved for distribution as to form and content by the Committee on Privileges and Elections of the first house of introduction of the resolution proposing the amendment as soon as practicable after enactment of the ballot question.

Any failure to comply with the provisions of this section shall not affect the validity of the constitutional amendment.

History.

1987, c. 311; 1999, c. 589; 2001, c. 1.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by ch. 1 substituted “shall post the explanation on its site on the Internet. It” for “of Elections” in the first paragraph; and in the second paragraph, substituted “which may include a brief statement on the effect of a ‘yes’ and ‘no’ vote on the question but shall not include arguments submitted” for “and shall not present arguments,” inserted “first” preceding “house of introduction,” and added “as soon as practicable after enactment of the ballot question” at the end of the last sentence.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

4C M.J. Constitutional Law, § 6.

§ 30-19.10.
Distribution of information on proposed questions to be submitted to voters.

Whenever a statewide referendum on a matter other than a constitutional amendment is submitted to the voters by the General Assembly, the State Board of Elections shall cause to be printed and distributed to the general registrar of each county and city, not less than ninety days prior to the election, copies of information about the referendum to be placed at each registration site in sufficient number to provide a copy to any interested person, and to election officials to be posted at the polling places on the day of the election. The State Board of Elections also shall cause the information to be published by paid advertisement in each daily newspaper with an average daily circulation of more than 50,000 in Virginia, and published in Virginia or in a contiguous state or district, once during the week preceding the final day for registration and once during the week preceding the referendum.

The information shall contain the ballot question and either (i) a neutral explanation of not more than 500 words on the proposed question, or (ii) for any bond referendum, a fiscal impact statement. The neutral explanation or the fiscal impact statement shall be presented in plain English, shall be limited to a neutral explanation, and shall not present arguments by either proponents or opponents of the proposal. The fiscal impact statement shall include descriptions of the need for and anticipated uses of the bond proceeds. The Division of Legislative Services, in consultation with such agencies of state government as may be appropriate, including the Office of the Attorney General, shall prepare the neutral explanation as part of the legislation authorizing the referendum. The staff of the House Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations shall each prepare a fiscal impact statement for any bond referendum and assist the Division of Legislative Services in preparing the explanation as part of the legislation authorizing the referendum.

For purposes of this section and § 30-19.9, “plain English” means written in nontechnical, readily understandable language using words of common everyday usage and avoiding legal terms and phrases or other terms and words of art whose usage or special meaning primarily is limited to a particular field or profession.

Any failure to comply with the provisions of this section shall not affect the validity of the statewide referendum.

History.

1996, c. 297; 2007, c. 402.

Editor’s note.

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “the House Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations” for “the House Appropriations Committee and Senate Finance Committee.” March 10, 2021.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 402, in the first paragraph, substituted “information about” for “an explanation” in the first sentence and “information” for “explanation” in the second sentence; rewrote the second paragraph; and deleted the former first sentence in the third paragraph.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Authority of local governments. —

Local governments have no authority to expend funds on advertising in support of, or in opposition to, a local or statewide referendum question; however, local governments may, consistent with the procedures detailed in §

24.2-687

, prepare and distribute a neutral, nonpartisan statement explaining a local referendum question. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Kevin G. Miller, Member, Senate of Virginia, 03-015, 2003 Va. AG LEXIS 20 (5/27/03).